Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-117] Reporting of actions.
(a) A producer shall report to the commissioner any civil or administrative
action taken against the producer in any jurisdiction or by a governmental
agency in any state within thirty days of the final disposition of the matter.

(b) Within thirty days of arraignment, a
producer shall report to the commissioner any criminal prosecution of the
producer being taken in any jurisdiction.

(c) The report shall include a copy of the
initial complaint or indictment filed and any and all other relevant legal
documents. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next